Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1999
Filing by rate service organization.

(1) A title insurer or title insurance agent may satisfy its obligation to file premium rates, rating manuals, and forms as required by the Title Insurers Act by becoming a member of, or a subscriber to, a rate service organization, organized and licensed under the insurance laws of this state, when the organization makes the filings, and by authorizing the director in writing to accept the filings on the title insurer's behalf.

(2) Nothing in the act shall be construed as requiring any title insurer or title insurance agent to become a member of, or a subscriber to, any rate service organization. Nothing in the act shall be construed as prohibiting the filing of deviations from rate service organization filings by any member or subscriber.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 22.